test/src/morphology/Pron-sina_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Pronoun - kaheksa: # pronouns '(eng) you [Sg.] / (fin) sinä' 
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: sinä
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: sinun
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ade: sinul
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+All: sinule
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: [sinul, sinulpäi]
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com: sinunke
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ill: sinuh
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ine: sinus
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abe: sinuttah
    sinä+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Par: sinuu

    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: häi
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: hänen
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ade: hänel
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+All: hänele
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: [hänel, hänelpäi]
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: hänenke
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: häneh
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: hänes
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abe: hänettäh
    häi+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Par: händy
